Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Part 2. Mobile Home Park Act

38-12-200.1.
Short title.

This part 2 shall be known and may be cited as the “Mobile Home Park Act”.

History.

Source:
L. 85:

Entire section added, p. 1198, § 1, effective June 6.

38-12-200.2.
Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby declares that the purpose of this part 2 is to establish the relationship between the owner of a mobile home park and the owner of a mobile home situated in such park.

History.

Source:
L. 85:

Entire section added, p. 1198, § 1, effective June 6.

38-12-201.
Application of part 2.

This part 2 shall apply only to manufactured homes as defined in section 42-1-102 (106)(b), C.R.S.

Repealed.

History.

Source:
L. 73:

P. 641, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 58-2-1.

L. 75:

(1) amended, p. 1467, § 10, effective July 18.

L. 81:

(1) amended and (2) repealed, pp. 1813, 1817, §§ 1, 10, effective June 9.

L. 89:

(1) amended, p. 729, § 34, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(1) amended, p. 706, § 13, effective April 19.

L. 95:

(1) amended, p. 951, § 2, effective May 25.

38-12-201.3.
Legislative declaration - increased availability of mobile home parks.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that mobile homes, manufactured housing, and factory-built housing are important and effective ways to meet Colorado’s affordable housing needs. The general assembly further finds and declares that, because of the unique aspects of mobile homes and mobile home park ownership, there is a need to protect mobile home owners from eviction with short notice so as to prevent mobile home owners from losing their shelter as well as any equity in their mobile homes. The general assembly encourages local governments to allow and protect mobile home parks in their jurisdictions and to enact plans to increase the number of mobile home parks in their jurisdictions. The general assembly further encourages local governments to provide incentives to mobile home park owners to attract additional mobile home parks and to increase the viability of current parks.

History.

Source:
L. 2005:

Entire section added, p. 110, § 4, effective August 8.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (SB 10-156), ch. 343, p. 1584, § 1, effective July 1.

38-12-201.5.
Definitions.

As used in this part 2 and in part 11 of this article 12, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Entry fee” means any fee paid to or received from an owner of a mobile home park or an agent thereof except for:

Rent;

A security deposit to pay for actual damages to the premises or to secure rental payments;

Fees charged by any governmental agency of the state, a county, a town, or a city;

Utilities;

Incidental reasonable charges for services actually performed by the mobile home park owner or the mobile home park owner’s agent and agreed to in writing by the home owner; and

Late fees.

“Home owner” means any person or family of a person who owns a mobile home that is subject to a tenancy in a mobile home park under a rental agreement.

(2.5)

“Late fee” has the meaning set forth in section 38-12-102 (3).

“Management” or “landlord” means the owner or person responsible for operating and managing a mobile home park or an agent, employee, or representative authorized to act on the management’s behalf in connection with matters relating to tenancy in the park.

“Management visit” means an entry by management on a mobile home lot.

“Mobile home” means:

A single-family dwelling that is built on a permanent chassis; is designed for long-term residential occupancy; contains complete electrical, plumbing, and sanitary facilities; is designed to be installed in a permanent or semipermanent manner with or without a permanent foundation; and is capable of being drawn over public highways as a unit or in sections by special permit; or

A manufactured home, as defined in section 38-29-102 (6), if the manufactured home is situated in a mobile home park.

“Mobile home park” or “park” means a parcel of land used for the continuous accommodation of five or more occupied mobile homes and operated for the pecuniary benefit of the owner of the parcel of land or the owner’s agents, lessees, or assignees. “Mobile home park” does not include mobile home subdivisions or property zoned for manufactured home subdivisions.

“Mobile home space”, “space”, “mobile home lot”, or “lot” means a parcel of land within a mobile home park designated by the management to accommodate one mobile home and its accessory buildings and to which the required sewer and utility connections are provided by the park.

“Premises” means a mobile home park and existing facilities and appurtenances of the park, including furniture and utilities where applicable, and grounds, areas, and existing facilities held out for the use of home owners generally or the use of which is promised to home owners.

“Rent” means any money or other consideration to be paid to the management for the right of use, possession, and occupation of the premises.

“Rental agreement” means an agreement, written or implied by law, between the management and a home owner establishing the terms and conditions of a tenancy, including reasonable rules and regulations promulgated by the park management. A lease is a rental agreement.

“Resident” means an individual who resides in a mobile home that is located in a mobile home park, regardless of whether the individual is the home owner.

“Retaliatory action” includes:

Increasing rent or decreasing services in a selective or excessive manner, or in a nonuniform manner to the extent that the nonuniform increase or decrease is unrelated to a legitimate business purpose;

Issuing mandatory fees in a selective or excessive manner, or in a nonuniform manner to the extent that the nonuniform issuance of the fees is unrelated to a legitimate business purpose;

Issuing warnings, citations, or fines that are not lawful;

Serving notices or threatening eviction when the notices or threats are not reasonably justified;

Billing a home owner in a selective or excessive manner, or in a nonuniform manner to the extent that the nonuniform billing is unrelated to a legitimate business purpose, for an item or service for which the home owner has not previously been billed;

Creating or modifying rules and regulations of the park that are not reasonably related to a legitimate purpose;

Selectively enforcing rules or requirements of the park;

Conducting management visits that are selective, nonuniform, or excessive; except that this subsection (12)(h) does not include management visits that are conducted for the purpose of providing notices that are required by law or by a rental agreement;

Altering or refusing to renew an existing rental agreement;

Surveilling a home owner who submits an oral or written complaint about a mobile home park to the management or to any federal, state, or local government agency; except that this subsection (12)(j) does not include routine, nonexcessive community inspections or documenting, photographing, or recording of violations of law, the rental agreement, or the rules and regulations of the park; or

Reporting or publicizing damaging information about a home owner who submits an oral or written complaint about a mobile home park to the management or to any federal, state, or local government agency.

“Tenancy” means the right of a home owner to:

Locate, maintain, and occupy a mobile home, including accessory structures for human habitation, on a space within a park;

Make improvements to the space; and

Use the services and facilities of the park.

History.

Source:
L. 81:

Entire section added, p. 1813, § 2, effective June 9.

L. 87:

(1) R&RE, (1.5) added, (5), (7), and (9) amended, and (8) repealed, pp. 1310, 1315, §§ 2, 1, 15, effective May 8.

L. 2010:

(2) amended,(SB 10-156), ch. 343, p. 1584, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

IP amended,(HB 19-1309), ch. 281, p. 2629, § 5, effective May 23.

L. 2020:

Entire section R&RE,(HB 20-1196), ch. 195, p. 910, § 1, effective June 30.

L. 2021:

(1)(e) amended,(SB 21-266), ch. 423, p. 2805, § 36, effective July 2; IP, (1)(d), and (1)(e) amended and (1)(f) and (2.5) added,(SB 21-173), ch. 349, p. 2267, § 9, effective October 1.

Editor’s note:

Amendments to subsection (1)(e) by SB 21-173 and SB 21-266 were harmonized.

38-12-202.
Tenancy - notice to quit.

No tenancy or other lease or rental occupancy of space in a mobile home park shall commence without a written lease or rental agreement, and no tenancy in a mobile home park shall be terminated until a notice to quit has been served. Said notice to quit shall be in writing and in the form specified in section 13-40-107 (2), C.R.S. The property description required in section 13-40-107 (2), C.R.S., shall be deemed legally sufficient if it states:

The name of the landlord or the mobile home park;

The mailing address of the property;

The location or space number upon which the mobile home is situate; and

The county in which the mobile home is situate.

Service of the notice to quit shall be as specified in section 13-40-108, C.R.S. Service by posting shall be deemed legally sufficient within the meaning of section 13-40-108, C.R.S., if the notice is affixed to the main entrance of the mobile home.

Except as otherwise provided in subsections (1)(c)(II) and (3) of this section, the management shall give a home owner at least ninety days after the date the notice is served or posted to sell the mobile home or remove it from the premises.

If management terminates a tenancy on grounds described in section 38-12-203 (1)(f), the management shall give the home owner at least ten days after the date the notice is served or posted to sell the mobile home or remove it from the premises.

Repealed.

In any notice provided by the management as required by this section, the management shall specify the reason for the termination, as described in section 38-12-203, of the tenancy that is the subject of the notice. If the management is terminating the tenancy because the mobile home or mobile home lot is out of compliance with local ordinances or state laws or rules relating to mobile homes and mobile home lots, as described in section 38-12-203 (1)(a), or out of compliance with written rules and regulations of the mobile home park, as described in section 38-12-203 (1)(c), the notice must include a statement advising the home owner that the home owner has a right to cure the noncompliance within ninety days after the date of service or posting of the notice to quit. This ninety-day period runs concurrently with the ninety-day period to sell the mobile home or remove it from the premises as set forth in subsection (1)(c)(I) of this section. Rent payment and other agreed tenant obligations remain in effect during this ninety-day period, and acceptance of rent by a landlord during this ninety-day period does not constitute a waiver of the landlord’s right to terminate the tenancy for any noncompliance described in section 38-12-203 (1)(a) or (1)(c).

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, in any action to terminate a home owner’s tenancy based on a violation described in section 38-12-203 (1)(a), the periods of time set forth in this section to provide home owners notice or a right to cure are superseded by any local ordinances, state laws or rules, or court orders that require a home owner’s compliance within a shorter time period.

History.

Source:
L. 73:

P. 641, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 58-2-2.

L. 79:

(1) amended, p. 1384, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

IP(1)(a) R&RE, p. 1814, § 3, effective June 9.

L. 87:

(1)(c) and (1)(d) amended, p. 1311, § 3, effective May 8.

L. 94:

(1)(c) amended, p. 703, § 1, effective April 19.

L. 96:

(2) amended, p. 670, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(3) added, p. 65, § 1, effective August 4.

L. 2000:

(3) repealed, p. 148, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended,(SB 10-156), ch. 343, p. 1585, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2020:

(1)(c) and (3) amended, (2) repealed, and (4) added,(HB 20-1196), ch. 195, p. 913, § 2, effective June 30.

38-12-202.5.
Action for termination.

The action for termination shall be commenced in the manner described in section 13-40-110, C.R.S. The property description shall be deemed legally sufficient and within the meaning of section 13-40-110, C.R.S., if it states:

The name of the landlord or the mobile home park;

The mailing address of the property;

The location or space number upon which the mobile home is situate; and

The county in which the mobile home is situate.

Service of summons shall be as specified in section 13-40-112, C.R.S. Service by posting shall be deemed legally sufficient within the meaning of section 13-40-112, C.R.S., if the summons is affixed to the main entrance of the mobile home.

Jurisdiction of courts in cases of forcible entry, forcible detainer, or unlawful detainer shall be as specified in section 13-40-109, C.R.S. Trial on the issue of possession shall be timely as specified in section 13-40-114, C.R.S., with no delay allowed for the determination of other issues or claims which may be severed at the discretion of the trial court.

After commencement of the action and before judgment, any person not already a party to the action who is discovered to have a property interest in the mobile home shall be allowed to enter into a stipulation with the landlord and be bound thereby.

The provisions of section 13-40-110.5 concerning suppression of court records apply to an action for termination.

History.

Source:
L. 79:

Entire section added, p. 1385, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2020:

(5) added, (HB 20-1009), ch. 37, p. 121, § 3, effective December 1.

38-12-203.
Reasons for termination.

The management of a mobile home park may terminate a tenancy only for one or more of the following reasons:

Except in the case of a home owner who cures a noncompliance as described in section 38-12-202 (3), failure of the home owner to comply with local ordinances and state laws and rules relating to mobile homes and mobile home lots;

Repealed.

Except in the case of a home owner who cures a noncompliance as described in section 38-12-202 (3), failure of the home owner to comply with written rules and regulations of the mobile home park that are enforceable pursuant to section 38-12-214 (1), are necessary to prevent material damage to real or personal property or to the health or safety of one or more individuals, and were:

Established by the management in the rental agreement at the inception of the tenancy;

Amended after the inception of the tenancy with the consent of the home owner; or

Amended after the inception of the tenancy without the consent of the home owner after providing sixty days’ prior written notice to the home owner.

Condemnation or change of use of the mobile home park. When the owner of a mobile home park is formally notified by a notice of intent to acquire pursuant to section 38-1-121 (1) or other similar provision of law, or a complaint in a condemnation action from an appropriate governmental agency that the mobile home park, or any portion thereof, is to be acquired by the governmental agency or may be the subject of a condemnation proceeding, the landlord shall, within seventeen days, notify the home owners in writing of the terms of the notice of intent to acquire or complaint received by the landlord.

If a landlord wants to change the use of a mobile home park, and the change of use has been approved by the local or state authority or does not require approval, and the change of use would result in the eviction of inhabited mobile homes, the landlord shall give the owner of each mobile home that is subject to the eviction a written notice of the landlord’s intent to evict not less than twelve months before the change of use of the land, which notice must be mailed to each home owner.

The making or causing to be made, with knowledge, of materially false or misleading statements on an application for tenancy;

Conduct of the home owner or any lessee of the home owner or any guest, agent, invitee, or associate of the home owner or lessee of the home owner that:

Occurs on the mobile home park premises and unreasonably endangers the life of the landlord, any home owner or lessee of the mobile home park, any person living in the park, or any guest, agent, invitee, or associate of the home owner or lessee of the home owner;

Occurs on the mobile home park premises and constitutes willful, wanton, or malicious damage to or destruction of property of the landlord, any home owner or lessee of the mobile home park, any person living in the park, or any guest, agent, invitee, or associate of the home owner or lessee of the home owner;

Occurs on the mobile home park premises, materially harms or threatens real or personal property or the health, safety, or welfare of one or more individuals or animals, including pet animals, as defined in section 35-80-102 (10), and constitutes a felony prohibited under article 3, 4, 6, 7, 9, 10, 12, or 18 of title 18; or

Was the basis for an action that declared the mobile home or any of its contents a class 1 public nuisance under section 16-13-303.

In an action pursuant to this part 2, the landlord shall have the burden of proving that the landlord complied with the relevant notice requirements and that the landlord provided the home owner with a statement of reasons for the termination. In addition to any other defenses a home owner may have, it shall be a defense that the landlord’s allegations are false or that the reasons for termination are invalid.

History.

Source:
L. 73:

P. 642, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 58-2-3.

L. 79:

(1)(d) amended, p. 1386, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(1)(c) amended, p. 1814, § 4, effective June 9.

L. 84:

(1)(c) amended, p. 976, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(c), (1)(d), and (2) amended, p. 1311, § 4, effective May 8.

L. 94:

(1)(f) added, p. 703, § 2, effective April 19.

L. 96:

IP(1), (1)(a), (1)(c), and (2) amended, p. 671, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(1)(c) and (1)(d) amended,(SB 10-156), ch. 343, p. 1586, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2020:

IP(1), (1)(a), (1)(c), (1)(d)(II), (1)(e), (1)(f)(III), and (1)(f)(IV) amended and (1)(b) repealed,(HB 20-1196), ch. 195, p. 914, § 3, effective June 30.

38-12-204.
Nonpayment of rent - notice required for rent increase.

Any tenancy or other estate at will or lease in a mobile home park may be terminated upon the landlord’s written notice to the home owner requiring, in the alternative, payment of rent or the removal of the home owner’s unit from the premises, within a period of not less than ten days after the date notice is served or posted, for failure to pay rent when due.

Rent shall not be increased without sixty days’ written notice to the home owner. In addition to the amount and the effective date of the rent increase, such written notice shall include the name, address, and telephone number of the mobile home park management, if such management is a principal owner, or owner of the mobile home park and, if the owner is other than a natural person, the name, address, and telephone number of the owner’s chief executive officer or managing partner; except that such ownership information need not be given if it was disclosed in the rental agreement made pursuant to section 38-12-213.

A landlord shall not increase rent more than one time in any twelve-month period of consecutive occupancy by the tenant, regardless of:

Whether there is a written rental agreement for the tenancy;

The length of the tenancy; and

Whether the tenant’s rental agreement is for a fixed tenancy, a month-to-month tenancy, or an indefinite term.

History.

Source:
L. 73:

P. 642, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 58-2-4.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 1708, § 1, effective July 7.

L. 85:

Entire section amended, p. 1199, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 87:

Entire section amended, p. 1312, § 5, effective May 8.

L. 2019:

(1) amended,(HB 19-1309), ch. 281, p. 2629, § 6, effective May 23.

L. 2021:

(3) added,(HB 21-1121), ch. 348, p. 2260, § 3, effective June 25.

38-12-204.3.
Notice required for termination.

Where the tenancy of a mobile home owner is being terminated under section 38-12-202 or section 38-12-204, the landlord or mobile home park owner shall provide such mobile home owner with written notice as provided for in subsection (2) of this section. Service of such notice shall occur at the same time and in the same manner as service of:

The notice to quit as provided in section 38-12-202 (1); or

The notice of nonpayment of rent as provided in section 38-12-204 (1).

The notice required under this section must be in at least ten-point type and must read as follows:

IMPORTANT NOTICE TO THE HOME OWNER:

This notice and the accompanying notice to quit/notice of nonpayment of rent are the first steps in the eviction process. Any dispute you may have regarding the grounds for eviction should be addressed with your landlord or the management of the mobile home park or in the courts if an eviction action is filed. Please be advised that the “Mobile Home Park Act”, part 2 of article 12 of title 38, Colorado Revised Statutes, and the “Mobile Home Park Act Dispute Resolution and Enforcement Program” created in section 38-12-1104, Colorado Revised Statutes, may provide you with legal protection.

NOTICE TO QUIT: In order to terminate a home owner’s tenancy, the landlord or management of a mobile home park must serve to a home owner a notice to quit. The notice must be in writing and must contain certain information, including:

• The grounds for the termination of the tenancy;

• Whether or not the home owner has a right to cure under the “Mobile Home Park Act”; and

• That the home owner has the option of mediation pursuant to section 38-12-216, Colorado Revised Statutes, of the “Mobile Home Park Act” and the option of filing a complaint through the “Mobile Home Park Act Dispute Resolution and Enforcement Program” created in section 38-12-1104, Colorado Revised Statutes.

NOTICE OF NONPAYMENT OF RENT: In order to terminate a home owner’s tenancy due to nonpayment of rent, the landlord or management of a mobile home park must serve to a home owner a notice of nonpayment of rent. The notice must be in writing and must require that the home owner either make payment of rent or sell the owner’s unit or remove it from the premises within a period of not less than ten days after the date the notice is served or posted, for failure to pay rent when due.

CURE PERIODS: If the home owner has a right to cure under the “Mobile Home Park Act”, the landlord or management of a mobile home park cannot terminate a home owner’s tenancy without first providing the home owner with a time period to cure the noncompliance. “Cure” refers to a home owner remedying, fixing, or otherwise correcting the situation or problem that made the tenancy subject to termination pursuant to sections 38-12-202, 38-12-203, or 38-12-204, Colorado Revised Statutes.

COMMENCEMENT OF LEGAL ACTION TO TERMINATE THE TENANCY: After the last day of the applicable notice period required by section 38-12-202 (1)(c), Colorado Revised Statutes, a legal action may be commenced to take possession of the space leased by the home owner. In order to evict a home owner, the landlord or management of the mobile home park must prove:

• The landlord or management complied with the notice requirements of the “Mobile Home Park Act”;

• The landlord or management provided the home owner with a statement of reasons for termination of the tenancy; and

• The reasons for termination of the tenancy are true and valid under the “Mobile Home Park Act”.

To defend against an eviction action, a home owner must appear in court. If the court rules in favor of the landlord or management of the mobile home park, the home owner has not less than thirty days from the time of the ruling to either remove or sell the mobile home and to vacate the premises. If the home owner wishes to extend such period beyond thirty days but not more than sixty days from the date of the ruling, the home owner shall prepay to the landlord an amount equal to a pro rata share of rent for each day following the expiration of the initial thirty-day period after the court’s ruling that the mobile home owner will remain on the premises. All prepayments shall be paid no later than thirty days after the court ruling. This section does not preclude earlier removal by law enforcement officers of a mobile home or one or more mobile home owners or occupants from the mobile home park if a mobile home owner violates article 3, 4, 6, 7, 9, 10, 12, or 18 of title 18 or section 16-13-303, Colorado Revised Statutes.

History.

Source:
L. 2000:

Entire section added, p. 146, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(2) amended,(SB 10-156), ch. 343, p. 1587, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

(2) amended,(HB 19-1309), ch. 281, p. 2629, § 7, effective May 23.

L. 2020:

(2) amended,(HB 20-1196), ch. 195, p. 915, § 4, effective June 30.

38-12-205.
Termination prohibited.

A tenancy or other estate at will or lease in a mobile home park may not be terminated solely for the purpose of making the home owner’s space in the park available for another mobile home or trailer coach.

History.

Source:
L. 73:

P. 642, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 58-2-5.

L. 87:

Entire section amended, p. 1312, § 6, effective May 8.

38-12-206.
Home owner meetings - assembly in common areas.

Home owners shall have the right to meet and establish a homeowners’ association. Meetings of home owners or the homeowners’ association relating to mobile home living and affairs in their park common area, community hall, or recreation hall, if such a facility or similar facility exists, shall not be subject to prohibition by the park management if the common area or hall is reserved according to the park rules and such meetings are held at reasonable hours and when the facility is not otherwise in use; except that no such meetings shall be held in the streets or thoroughfares of the mobile home park.

History.

Source:
L. 73:

P. 642, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 58-2-6.

L. 87:

Entire section amended, p. 1313, § 7, effective May 8.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 109, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (SB 10-156), ch. 343, p. 1588, § 6, effective July 1.

38-12-207.
Security deposits - legal process.

The owner of a mobile home park or the owner’s agents may charge a security deposit in an amount not greater than one month’s rent.

Legal process, other than eviction, shall be used for the collection of utility charges and incidental service charges other than those provided by the rental agreement.

A security deposit remains the property of the home owner, and a landlord shall deposit each security deposit into a separate trust account to be administered by the landlord as a private trustee. For the purpose of preserving the corpus, the landlord shall not commingle the trust funds with other money; however, the landlord may keep the interest and profits earned from the corpus as compensation for administering the trust account.

History.

Source:
L. 73:

P. 642, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 58-2-7.

L. 81:

(1) R&RE, p. 1815, § 5, effective June 9.

L. 2020:

(1) amended and (3) added, (HB 20-1196), ch. 195, p. 917, § 5, effective June 30.

38-12-208.
Remedies.

Upon granting judgment for possession by the landlord in a forcible entry and detainer action, the court shall immediately issue a writ of restitution which the landlord shall take to the sheriff. In addition, if a money judgment has been requested in the complaint and if service was accomplished by personal service, the court shall determine and enter judgment for any amounts due to the landlord and shall calculate a pro rata daily rent amount that must be paid for the home to remain in the park. The court may rely upon information provided by the landlord or the landlord’s attorney when determining the pro rata daily rent amount to be paid by the home owner. Upon receipt of the writ of restitution, the sheriff shall serve notice in accordance with the requirements of section 13-40-108, C.R.S., to the home owner of the court’s decision and entry of judgment.

The notice of judgment must state that, at a specified time not less than thirty days from the entry of judgment, which may be extended to not more than sixty days after the entry of judgment if the home owner has prepaid no later than thirty days after the court ruling to the landlord an amount equal to a pro rata share of rent for each day following the expiration of the initial thirty-day period after the court’s ruling that the mobile home owner will remain on the premises, and in instances where the mobile home must be removed from the mobile home lot, the sheriff shall return to serve a writ of restitution and superintend the peaceful and orderly removal of the mobile home under that order of court. The notice of judgment must also advise the home owner, in instances where the mobile home must be removed from the mobile home lot, to prepare the mobile home for removal from the premises by removing the skirting, disconnecting utilities, attaching tires, and otherwise making the mobile home safe and ready for highway travel.

Should the home owner fail to have the mobile home safe and ready for physical removal from the premises or should inclement weather or other unforeseen problems occur at the time specified in the notice of judgment, the landlord and the sheriff may, by written agreement, extend the time for the execution of the writ of restitution to allow time for the landlord to arrange to have the necessary work done or to permit the sheriff’s execution of the writ of restitution at a time when weather or other conditions will make removal less hazardous to the mobile home.

If the mobile home is not removed from the landlord’s land on behalf of the mobile home owner within the time permitted by the writ of restitution, then the landlord and the sheriff shall have the right to take possession of the mobile home for the purposes of removal and storage. The liability of the landlord and the sheriff in such event shall be limited to gross negligence or willful and wanton disregard of the property rights of the home owner. The responsibility to prevent freezing and to prevent wind and weather damage to the mobile home lies exclusively with those persons who have a property interest in the mobile home; except that the landlord may take appropriate action to prevent freezing, to prevent wind and weather damage, and to prevent damage caused by vandals.

Reasonable removal and storage charges and the costs associated with preventing damage caused by wind, weather, or vandals can be paid by any party in interest. Those charges will run with the mobile home, and whoever ultimately claims the mobile home will owe that sum to the person who paid it.

Prior to the issuance of said writ of restitution, the court shall make a finding of fact based upon evidence or statements of counsel that there is or is not a security agreement on the mobile home being subjected to the writ of restitution. A written statement on the mobile home owner’s application for tenancy with the landlord that there is no security agreement on the mobile home shall be prima facie evidence of the nonexistence of such security agreement.

In those cases where the court finds there is a security agreement on the mobile home subject to the writ of restitution and where that holder of the security agreement can be identified with reasonable certainty, then, upon receipt of the writ of restitution, the plaintiff shall promptly inform the holder of such security agreement as to the location of the mobile home, the name of the landlord who obtained the writ of restitution, and the time when the mobile home will be subject to removal by the sheriff and the landlord.

The remedies provided in part 1 of this article and article 40 of title 13, C.R.S., except as inconsistent with this part 2, shall be applicable to this part 2.

History.

Source:
L. 73:

P. 643, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 58-2-8.

L. 79:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1386, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(1)(a) to (1)(d) amended, p. 1313, § 8, effective May 8.

L. 91:

(1)(d) and (1)(e) amended, p. 1695, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(1)(a) and (1)(b) amended,(SB 10-156), ch. 343, p. 1589, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

(1)(b) amended,(HB 19-1309), ch. 281, p. 2630, § 8, effective May 23.

38-12-209.
Entry fees prohibited - security deposit - court costs.

The owner of a mobile home park, or the agent of such owner, shall neither pay to nor receive from an owner or a seller of a mobile home an entry fee of any type as a condition of tenancy in a mobile home park.

Repealed.

The trial judge may award court costs and attorney fees in any court action brought pursuant to any provision of this part 2 to the prevailing party upon finding that the prevailing party undertook the court action and legal representation for a legally sufficient reason and not for a dilatory or unfounded cause.

The management or a resident may bring a civil action for violation of the rental agreement or any provision of this part 2 in the appropriate court of the county in which the park is located. Either party may recover actual damages or the court may in its discretion award such equitable relief as it deems necessary, including the enjoining of either party from further violations.

History.

Source:
L. 75:

Entire section added, p. 1414, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 79:

(1), IP(2), and (2)(b) amended and (3) added, p. 1387, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(2)(b) amended and (4) added, p. 1815, §§ 6, 7, effective June 9.

L. 87:

(2)(b) and (2)(e) amended, p. 1313, § 9, effective May 8.

L. 2020:

(2) repealed and (4) amended, (HB 20-1196), ch. 195, p. 917, § 6, effective June 30.

38-12-210.
Closed parks prohibited.

Neither the owner of a mobile home park nor the owner’s agent may require as a condition of tenancy in a mobile home park that a prospective home owner has purchased a mobile home from any particular seller or from any one of a particular group of sellers.

Such owner or agent shall not give any special preference in renting to a prospective home owner who has purchased a mobile home from a particular seller.

A seller of mobile homes shall not require as a condition of sale that a purchaser locate in a particular mobile home park or in any one of a particular group of mobile home parks.

The owner or operator of a mobile home park shall treat all persons equally in renting or leasing available space. Notwithstanding the foregoing, nothing in this subsection (4) shall be construed to preclude owners and operators of mobile home parks from providing housing for older persons as defined in section 24-34-502 (7)(b), C.R.S.

History.

Source:
L. 75:

Entire section added, p. 1414, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(4) added, p. 1815, § 8, effective June 9.

L. 87:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 1314, § 10, effective May 8.

L. 92:

(4) amended, p. 1128, § 12, effective July 1.

L. 2020:

(1) amended, (HB 20-1196), ch. 195, p. 918, § 7, effective June 30.

38-12-211.
Selling fees prohibited - “for sale” signs permitted.

Neither the owner of a mobile home park nor the owner’s agent may require payment of any type of selling fee or transfer fee by either a home owner in the park wishing to sell the home owner’s mobile home to another party or by any party wishing to buy a mobile home from a home owner in the park as a condition of tenancy in a park for the prospective buyer.

This section does not prevent the owner of a mobile home park or the owner’s agent from applying the normal park standards to prospective buyers before granting or denying tenancy or from charging a reasonable selling fee or transfer fee for services actually performed and agreed to in writing by a home owner.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect the rent charged by a landlord to a home owner pursuant to a rental agreement.

The owner of a mobile home may place a “for sale” sign on or in the owner’s mobile home. The size, placement, and character of the sign is subject to reasonable rules and regulations of the mobile home park.

History.

Source:
L. 75:

Entire section added, p. 1415, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 79:

Entire section amended, p. 1388, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 87:

Entire section amended, p. 1314, § 11, effective May 8.

L. 2020:

Entire section amended, (HB 20-1196), ch. 195, p. 918, § 8, effective June 30.

38-12-212.
Certain types of landlord-seller agreements prohibited.

A seller of mobile homes shall not pay or offer cash or other consideration to the owner of a mobile home park or the park owner’s agent for the purpose of reserving spaces or otherwise inducing acceptance of one or more mobile homes in a mobile home park.

History.

Source:
L. 75:

Entire section added, p. 1415, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2020:

Entire section amended, (HB 20-1196), ch. 195, p. 918, § 9, effective June 30.